Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Capitol and State Building Commission

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to construction, care and preservation of public buildings, see art. 7, § 22, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision prohibiting loans on credit or donations by state or any political subdivision thereof and requiring vote of people for works of internal improvement, see art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies §§ 64 to 67.

81A C.J.S. States § 147.

§ 9-5-101.
State building commission; composition; general powers and duties; conflicts of interest.

The five (5) elected state officers constitute the state building commission. The governor shall be chairman of the commission, but in his absence from any meeting, one (1) of the members may act as chairman, and shall preside at the meeting. All votes taken to decide the commission’s final action on any matter shall be recorded.

The state building commission shall promulgate rules under which the general services division has charge and control of the capitol building with respect to its repair and maintenance and shall collect all rents arising from the occupancy of the capitol building. The state building commission may also promulgate rules governing occupancy of the capitol building for executive department officials.

No member of the state building commission shall:

Have a financial interest in any contract entered into or made by the commission, the general services division or by the state construction department;

Be a surety on any bond conditioned for the performance of any contract entered into or made by the commission, the general services division or by the state construction department;

Be an agent of any contractor on any contract entered into or made by the commission, the general services division or by the state construction department.

The commission shall oversee the development, creation and modification of a master plan for maintenance, preservation, restoration, rehabilitation, construction and enhancement within the capitol complex. During the development, creation or modification of the capitol complex master plan the commission may consult with members of the state capitol building rehabilitation and restoration oversight group or members of management council, as applicable. The commission shall have final approval authority of the capitol complex master plan. The commission shall review all proposals to remodel or construct a building, monument or other improvement within the capitol complex for conformance with the master plan. The commission shall notify the management council of the legislature of any proposed adoption of or modifications to the master plan for the capitol complex not less than sixty (60) days prior to taking any action to adopt or modify the plan.

As used in this article:

“Capitol complex” means all state owned grounds and facilities within the area bounded by 26th Street to the north, Pioneer Avenue to the west, 22nd Street to the south, and Warren Avenue to the east, the Pioneer building on Pioneer Avenue and the historic Wyoming governor’s mansion and grounds located at the corner of House and 21st streets, all within the city of Cheyenne, Wyoming;

“Commission” means the state building commission.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 30, §§ 11, 13; 1890, ch. 62, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 708 to 710; C.S. 1910, §§ 371 to 373; C.S. 1920, §§ 421 to 423; R.S. 1931, §§ 104-102 to 104-104; C.S. 1945, §§ 22-102 to 22-104; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-627 to 9-629; Laws 1973, ch. 65, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-8-101 to 9-8-103; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1996, ch. 100, § 2; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2013 ch. 184, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 40, § 2, effective March 6, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 197, § 1, effective March 15, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to rental charged for capitol building, see §

9-5-104

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last two sentences in (a).

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), added the third sentence.

Laws 2014, ch. 40, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 6, 2014.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (c)(i) through (c)(iii), deleted “or by” preceding “the general services division” and added “or by the state construction department” at the end.

The 2019 amendment,

in (b), substituted “its repair” for “its occupancy, repair,” substituted “The state building commission may also promulgate rules governing occupancy of the capitol building for executive department official” for the last two sentences, which read: “All rents collected under this section shall be paid into the general fund.
Rules with respect to the occupancy of the capitol building shall be subject to and in accordance with W.S.

9-5-112

”; and added (d) and (e).

Laws 2019, ch. 197 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature March 15, 2019.

Elected state officers. —

The “five (5) elected state officers” referred to in subsection (a) are the governor, secretary of state, auditor, treasurer and superintendent of public instruction. See art. 4, §§ 3 and 11, Wyo. Const.

History of commission. —

Sections 1 to 55, ch. 37, Laws 1886, provided for the selection of sites, bonds for funds and erection of the state capitol building and the state university.

Sections 1 to 18, ch. 30, Laws 1888, provided for a new building commission to replace the commission created by ch. 37, Laws 1886, and for the financing and completion of the building. Sections 11 and 13, ch. 30, Laws 1888, appear herein as §

9-5-101

. All other sections have been repealed or are deemed to be obsolete.

Task force. —

Laws 2004, ch. 129, § 1, creates the joint legislative and executive task force on capitol facilities, comprised of the governor or his designee, the secretary of state or his designee, the state treasurer or her designee, the state auditor or his designee, he state superintendent of public instruction or his designee, the president, vice president, majority and minority floor leaders of the Wyoming senate, the speaker, speaker pro tempore, majority and minority floor leaders of the Wyoming house of representatives, the two legislative liaisons to the state building commission and the chairman of the appropriations committee of the house of representatives, and the chief justice of the supreme court or his designee. The task force is to: (1) conduct a comprehensive review of space requirements of the state-wide elected officials and the legislature; (2) review previous reports and studies and consider space allocation alternatives including the possible relocation of offices and the lease, purchase or construction of additional facilities; (3) develop maintenance, repair and restoration priorities for the state capitol and existing facilities within the capitol complex; (4) develop both long and short term proposals for addressing space requirements both in the state capitol building and in the capitol complex; (5) report its findings and recommendations to the state building commission, the legislative management council and the joint appropriations interim committee by December 1, 2004, and make a final report by December 1, 2005; (6) submit specific project recommendations to the state building commission for approval and authorization of funding; and (7) recommend to the management council statutory changes that may be required to implement project recommendations. Section 2 of the act appropriates 40,000 from the general fund to the legislative service office to fund the interim meetings and activities of the task force and to contract with appropriate professionals as necessary to complete the task force study. It additionally appropriates $250,000 from the general fund to the state building commission to be used to implement projects recommended by the task force and approved by the commission.

Laws 2004, ch. 129, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

§ 9-5-102.
State building commission; authority to buy and lease property; acceptance of donations, grants and devises.

In order to obtain building sites for additional office space and state uses and to insure the proper keeping of valuable state records and provide for the expansion of functions of the state, the general services division, with the approval of the state building commission, may buy, take options to buy and lease property to be used for building sites for future state office buildings. The general services division, with the approval of the commission may lease acquired property until it is needed. The general services division, with the approval of the state building commission, in cooperation with the department of workforce services, may acquire lands and buildings in the name of the state of Wyoming by purchase, lease agreement, gift or devise to provide suitable quarters for the administration of the Wyoming Employment Security Law and to develop improvements, maintain and repair the lands and buildings. The commission shall not approve the exercise of any authority under this section for any property which is or would be within the boundaries of the capitol complex which is inconsistent with the master plan for the capitol complex without providing at least sixty (60) days’ notice of the proposed action to the management council of the legislature.

To accomplish the purposes of subsection (a) of this section the general services division, with the approval of the state building commission, may accept donations, grants-in-aid and devises.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 188, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-639, 9-640; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-8-120, 9-8-121; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1996, ch. 100, § 2; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2019 ch. 197, § 1, effective March 15, 2019.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a).

The 2019 amendment,

in (a), added the last sentence.

Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature March 15, 2019.

Wyoming Employment Security Law. —

See §§

27-3-101

and 27-3-102(a)(xxii).

§ 9-5-103.
State building commission; supervision and control of governor's residence.

The governor’s residence and the buildings, grounds and property thereto attached belonging to the state of Wyoming are under the supervision and control of the state building commission.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 49, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 380; C.S. 1920, § 430; R.S. 1931, § 104-111; C.S. 1945, § 22-111; W.S. 1957, § 9-641; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-130; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1996, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to furnishing site for and use of governor's residence, see §

9-1-213

.

§ 9-5-104.
State building commission; state office buildings; authority to maintain; rental; use of proceeds.

The general services division, in accordance with rules of the state building commission, may maintain, operate, lease, manage and equip state office buildings in Wyoming.

Every department occupying space in a building authorized under subsection (a) of this section, if required to do so by the general services division, in accordance with rules of the state building commission, shall pay to the general services division an annual rental plus a pro rata share of maintenance, janitorial services, utilities and other overhead costs necessary to maintain the building in as good a condition as reasonable and proper use will permit. Payments under this subsection shall be made to the general services division for deposit into a separate account, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer, to be allocated as follows:

An amount as determined by the capital building commission into the revenue utilities and custodial account to be appropriated by the legislature for payment of utilities and custodial services only; and

The remaining amount into the facilities management revenue maintenance account until appropriated by the legislature for deferred maintenance of state buildings.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 249, §§ 1, 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-647.1, 9-647.4; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-8-140, 9-8-143; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1996, ch. 100, § 2; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “a fund within the internal service fund” in (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “general services division” for “state treasurer” twice, and inserted “under this subsection” and “with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer” in the second sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-5-105.
Purchase or lease of state lands and buildings; state building commission authority.

Before purchasing any land for any state purpose, the state agency or board shall, in accordance with rules of the state building commission, determine if any land owned by the state is available and could be used for the state purpose. The agency or board shall, in accordance with rules of the state building commission, negotiate with the agency or board owning or controlling the land for purchase or lease of the lands.

Any state agency, assigned the operation, management or use of a state leased or owned building by statute shall follow rules of the state building commission regarding to the operation, management and use of the building unless the agency adopts rules different than those of the commission in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

9-5-106

.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1996, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 9-5-106.
State building commission; powers relative to use of state buildings; rules authorized; exceptions.

The state building commission is authorized to adopt rules and regulations relative to the operation, management and use of any state leased or owned building. If the operation, management and use of a state leased or owned building is assigned by statute to any other state agency that agency may adopt rules and regulations relative to the operation, management and use of the building different than those of the commission.

The secretary to the commission under W.S. 9-2-3204(b)(xxi) shall administratively implement any rules of the state building commission adopted under this section. The director of the department of administration and information may adopt rules and regulations which make violation of rules adopted by the commission under subsection (a) of this section grounds for disciplinary action for any state employee violating the rules of the state building commission regarding operation, management or use of state buildings.

Any state agency, board or commission having authority for the supervision, control or management of state leased or owned buildings located anywhere in the state of Wyoming is authorized to adopt rules and regulations for the operation, management and use of state leased or owned buildings to the same extent as provided by subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

No rule promulgated under W.S.

9-5-101

through

9-5-108

shall apply to facilities occupied by:

The legislature or the members thereof unless the legislative management council has specifically concurred therein. For purposes of this paragraph “facilities occupied by the legislature” shall include those rooms and areas specified in W.S. 28-8-112(a)(i) through (vi) and other facilities specified by law; or

The judiciary or the members thereof unless the judicial council has specifically concurred therein.

No architectural or structural alteration to the capitol building or its grounds shall be made without approval of the state building commission. Except for emergency maintenance as provided for in this subsection, the state building commission shall not approve of any architectural or structural alteration to the capitol building or grounds without providing notice to the management council of the legislature and without a legislative session convening and adjourning after notice was provided to the management council. Routine maintenance and repair necessary to keep the capitol building in safe and good working order, including janitorial, grounds keeping and maintenance tasks done on a routine basis, shall be conducted in a manner not to alter the capitol building structurally or architecturally to the extent practicable. Major maintenance and repair shall also be conducted in a manner not to alter the capitol building structurally or architecturally to the extent practicable. Emergency maintenance which would structurally or architecturally alter the capitol building shall only be undertaken prior to a legislative session convening and adjourning after notification under this subsection if the maintenance is immediately necessary to keep the capitol building in good working order or to prevent harm to the building. The state building commission shall provide prior notification to the management council of the legislature of any planned major maintenance activity and shall immediately notify the management council of any emergency major maintenance activity.

In managing areas of the capitol building and grounds and the extension from the capitol building to and under the Herschler building, the state building commission and the management council of the legislature shall enter into memoranda of understanding and other agreements as they determine appropriate to provide effective, comprehensive and coordinated visitor, civic education and other services to the public. The agreements shall also provide for:

Maintenance and preservation of the capitol building and grounds and the extension by the general services division subject to direction by the commission;

Management of meeting rooms and common spaces with a goal of maximizing authorized uses. An elected statewide official’s request to schedule a meeting room under control of the legislature shall be accommodated so long as the meeting room was not previously scheduled for use by the legislature or a committee of the legislature;

Coordination of programs for exhibits, artwork, art collections, statuary and furnishings to reflect and maintain the historic aspects of the capitol building.

The following definitions shall apply to this section, subject to further definition by rule of the commission, provided the rules shall not be less restrictive than the following:

“Architectural alteration” of a building means a material modification to the finish or architectural details of a floor, wall or ceiling, including casing, trim and other attachments thereto, and excluding repair or replacement which attempts to retain existing finishes and architectural details;

“Structural alteration” of a building means any change in the supporting members of a building, such as bearing walls, columns, beams and girders, or a material change in the dimensions or configurations of a floor, ceiling or wall;

“Architectural or structural alteration” of grounds shall include material modification of contours or placement or removal of pathways or statues.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 33, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1996, ch. 100, § 2; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2019 ch. 197, § 1, effective March 15, 2019; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2019 amendment,

in (d)(i), added the last sentence; and added (e) through (g).

Laws 2019, ch. 197 § 6(a), makes (d)(i) and (f) effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature March 15, 2019.

Laws 2019, ch. 197 § 6(b), makes (e) and (g) effective January 1, 2020.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3204(b)(xxi)" for "9-2-1016(b)(xxi)" in the first sentence of (b).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-5-107.
Duties and responsibilities with respect to state buildings; state capital construction needs assessment and priorities.

The state construction department shall, subject to the direction of the state building commission and with the assistance of other state agencies as necessary, conduct and maintain a comprehensive needs assessment of existing state buildings and of future space requirements for state agencies. The assessment shall be conducted in accordance with rules of the state building commission adopted pursuant to subsection (d) of this section and be designed to provide uniform statewide data describing the condition of state buildings and projecting building longevity and space requirements. Through the identification of building conditions and needs, the assessment shall enable the evaluation of capital construction and renovation requirements for all state buildings. The needs assessment shall be revised annually on or before October 1 of each year. The needs assessment shall specify construction and renovation requirements for the remainder of the current fiscal year and the succeeding four (4) fiscal years.

On or before November 1 of each year and based upon the statewide needs assessment of state buildings performed under subsection (a) of this section, the state building commission shall establish and prioritize construction and renovation needs for state buildings. The listing shall specifically identify and prioritize those buildings in need of building construction or renovation and the estimated costs of required construction or renovation during the current fiscal year and during the succeeding four (4) fiscal years.

On or before December 1 of each year, the commission shall provide copies of the needs assessment and statewide construction and renovation priorities established under this section to members of the legislature.

The state building commission shall adopt rules implementing policies for the management of state buildings. The rules shall establish:

Uniform standards and procedures for condition assessments of state buildings;

Criteria to guide prioritization of construction and renovation needs of state buildings;

Requirements for planned maintenance schedules designed to eliminate maintenance backlogs and to establish proactive maintenance practices;

Uniform standards for assessing and approving agency building and other space needs.

Rules and procedures adopted under this section by the state building commission shall be applicable to all state owned buildings unless the operation, management and use of the building has been assigned by statute to a specific state agency. The agency responsible for the operation and management of a state building exempted by the provisions of this subsection, shall provide the assessment required by subsections (a) through (c) of this section to the state building commission for inclusion in the commission’s report to the legislature. The rules adopted by the commission under subsection (d) of this section shall be used as guidelines for the management of state buildings assigned by statute to other state agencies including the University of Wyoming, community college districts, department of transportation, game and fish commission and state institutions.

The state building commission shall meet at least quarterly and shall promulgate rules specifying procedures under which public comment may be received regarding any actions of the commission, excluding promulgation of rules to which the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act is applicable.

The state building commission shall adopt a formula for major building and facility repair and replacement for community college facilities. The formula shall:

Be based on the gross square footage of buildings and facilities for not more than seven (7) categories of buildings and shall:

Include only buildings providing education programs comprising the statewide college system strategic plan developed and maintained under W.S. 21-18-202(a)(v);

Specifically exclude student housing, student unions and auxiliary services areas funded exclusively through community college generated revenues.

Use a multiplier to maintain facilities in at least fair condition based on criteria from organizations with expertise in the area of major maintenance funding;

Otherwise be computed in the same manner as for major maintenance for school facilities under W.S.

21-15-109

, including using the most current edition of the R.S. Means construction cost index, as modified to reflect current Wyoming construction costs determined by the department of administration and information, division of economic analysis, to calculate replacement cost.

As used in this section “major building and facility repair and replacement” means the repair or replacement of complete or major portions of building and facility systems at irregular intervals which is:

Required to continue the use of the building or facility at its original capacity for its original intended use, including for compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act, and including installing fire suppression systems in residential facilities; and

Typically accomplished by contractors due to the personnel demand to accomplish the work in a timely manner, the level of sophistication of the work or the need for warranted work.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 100, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2014 ch. 2, § 1, effective March 3, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2014 amendment,

added (g) and (h).

Laws 2014, ch. 2, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 3, 2014.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “The state construction department” for “The general services division of the department of administration and information” at the beginning of (a).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(viii), substituted “Beginning 2018” for “Beginning 2014,” inserted “and other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a),” substituted “county clerk” for “board of county commissioners,” inserted “or other specified entity,” inserted the second sentence, inserted “or posting” following “report,” and substituted “December 31, 2017” for December 31, 2013.”

§ 9-5-108.
Development of building projects; rehabilitation of building projects.

The commission shall, on the basis of a state needs assessment plan or as otherwise directed by the legislature and after consultation with and advice from state agencies and officials, other appropriate agencies and officials and members of the public, identify and select potential projects to be studied for inclusion in the Wyoming public buildings construction program pursuant to the following schedule:

Level I reconnaissance studies shall, to the extent possible:

Describe the project;

Identify the need for the project;

In cooperation with appropriate local, county and state agencies, assess the status of proposed site ownerships, including existing conflicts and recommendations for resolution of the conflicts and other potential obstacles;

Assess and describe local, state and federal permits required for construction;

Assess environmental considerations and constraints;

Identify legal constraints to development;

Identify alternate sources of space to purchase and lease;

Summarize public testimony received at meetings held by the commission in the county of the proposed construction; and

Contain the commission’s recommendation to the legislature whether to terminate further consideration of the proposed project or to continue the project at its current level of study, or to proceed with further activity under paragraph (ii), (iii) or (iv) of this subsection.

Level II feasibility studies shall to the extent possible:

Include a detailed analysis of factors relevant to development, construction, operation and maintenance;

Identify major problems and opportunities concerning development and the environmental, social and economic effects of development;

Identify the desired sequence of events, including commencement of local, state and federal permitting activities and acquisition of land;

Summarize testimony received at public hearings held by the commission in the county of the proposed construction;

Include soils and other site test drilling procedures;

Contain final concept design and cost estimates;

Include the project financing plan;

Identify the interests in land to be acquired and the proposed means and costs of acquisition. An “interest in land” may include the fee simple title or any other interest in land less than a fee simple; and

Include draft legislation describing in detail the construction, operation and financing of the proposed project.

Level III construction and operation plans shall proceed as authorized and approved by the legislature under the immediate direction and control of the commission. Pursuant to legislative authorization for public building construction projects and prior to completion of Level III construction the commission may:

Design, construct, acquire or purchase facilities related to the construction projects for use of any feature, facility, function or portion of a project;

Contract for the performance of any power under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, and consult with or employ experts and professional persons;

Acquire by purchase, lease, appropriation, gift, exchange or eminent domain, necessary land, easements and other property for construction, operation and maintenance of projects and accept gifts, grants and contributions of money from any source;

Contract with, contribute to or receive contributions from any legal subdivision of the state, special district, private corporation or person for the construction, operation, management and maintenance of any project or any interest in any facility or function of a project.

After completion of Level III construction, the commission shall turn over the project to the general services division of the department of administration and information for the operation and maintenance of state owned facilities constructed under the direction and control of the commission.

State agencies shall cooperate fully with the commission in the preparation of the studies. In the execution of these activities, the commission shall:

Receive and acquire data relating to the project;

Hold public hearings within the county where the proposed project will be wholly or partly constructed, consult with and receive the views of private persons, local groups, associations and organizations representing local citizens, industries and the public interest;

Coordinate the feasibility studies with the plans of other government agencies and departments;

Undertake studies, investigations, surveys and research relevant to the completion of the study and enter into contracts and arrangements for its completion with any government agency, department or any person, firm, university, institution or state or national organization;

Perform any other related activities or functions relevant and appropriate to the completion of the feasibility study; and

Maximize the use of all existing information, data, reports and other materials, and no funds shall be expended to duplicate existing information, data, reports and other materials.

The commission may suspend the expenditure of time or funds on a project at any level of activity, if it is established that it would be in the public interest. The commission shall report the reason for any suspension of activity to the legislature.

Any agency seeking to rehabilitate an existing public building shall submit that request to the commission. The commission shall review and develop plans and recommendations for the project as provided in this section.

As used in this section, “project” means any public building and all works and facilities necessary for the planning, construction and utilization of a state owned public building, including the improvement of any feature, facility, function or portion of a project. “Project” does not include those projects for which the operation, management and use of the building, works or the facility has been assigned by law to a specific state agency.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 100, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(i)(I) or (a)(ii)(I) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-5-109.
Advisory task force on capitol building rehabilitation and restoration; composition; duties; account created.

through (h) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 150, § 4.

There is created the capitol building rehabilitation and restoration account. Funds in the account shall only be expended upon appropriation by the legislature to implement projects approved by the legislature. Except as provided in this subsection, funds within the account shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e), 9-4-207(a) or any other provision of law, funds within the account shall not lapse or revert. At the end of each fiscal year, any unexpended, unobligated amounts in the fund shall be transferred to the capitol square preservation account created by W.S.

9-4-225

. Earnings on monies within the account shall be deposited to the account.

through (r) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 2.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 123, § 1; 2013 ch. 150, § 4, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 40, § 2, effective March 6, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 197, § 2, effective March 15, 2019; 2022 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a) through (h), pertaining to a task force on capitol building rehabilitation and restoration, composition and duties.

The 2014 amendment,

in (j), deleted “recommended by the task force and” following “implement projects” in the second sentence and added (k)-(r).

Laws 2014, ch. 40, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 6, 2014.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (m)(vi), substituted “state construction department” for “department of administration and information, construction management program”; and in (q), in the first sentence, substituted “state construction department” for “construction management program of the department.”

The 2019 amendment,

repealed (k) through (r), which pertained to the advisory task force on capitol building rehabilitation and restoration.

Laws 2019, ch. 197 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature March 15, 2019.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (j), substituted “Except as provided in this subsection” for “Notwithstanding any other provision of law” in the third sentence, deleted “until directed by the legislature” at the end of the fourth sentence, and added the fifth sentence.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, ch. 123, § 2, provides:

“(a) There is appropriatedfifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) from the general fund to the legislativeservice office. This appropriation shall be for the period beginningwith the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012. Thisappropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of paying salary,per diem and mileage for legislative members of the task force andper diem and mileage for legislative appointees. Notwithstanding anyother provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferredor expended for any other purpose. Funds appropriated under this subsectionshall not revert until June 30, 2012.

“(b) Seven million dollars($7,000,000.00) is appropriated and shall be transferred on July 1,2008, from the capitol building restoration account created by 2006Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 35, Section 300(g) as amended by 2007Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 136, Section 4, to the capitol buildingrehabilitation and restoration account created by this act.

“(c) Twenty million dollars($20,000,000.00) is appropriated and shall be transferred on July1, 2008, from the capitol complex construction account created by2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 35, Section 300(g) as amended by2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 136, Section 4, to the capitolbuilding rehabilitation and restoration account created by this act.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2013, ch. 150, § 4, effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a) through (h). Previously, subdivisions (d)(i), (d)(v), and (f) were vetoed by the Governor on March 14, 2008.

Effective date. —

Laws 2008, ch. 123, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 9-5-110.
State capitol building rehabilitation and restoration project; definitions.

As used in W.S.

9-5-109

through

9-5-113

:

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 2.

“Department” means the state construction department;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 2.

“Project” means the state capitol building and Herschler state office rehabilitation, restoration and renovation project described in W.S.

9-5-112

, including all components of the project.

History.

2014 ch. 40, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 197, § 2, effective March 15, 2019.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(ii), substituted “state construction department” for “department of administration and information.”

The 2019 amendment,

repealed (a)(i), which read: "`Advisory task force' means the joint legislative and executive advisory task force on capitol building rehabilitation and restoration created by W.S. 9-5-109(k)," and (a)(iii), which read: "`Oversight group' means the oversight group created by W.S.

9-5-111

."

Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 6(a), makes (a)(i) effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature March 15, 2019.

Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 6(b), makes (a)(iii) effective January 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 40, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 6, 2014.